Nevada, session 83, AB529.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 701 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A wholesale generation facility in this State which becomes
operational on or after January 1, 2026, and is located within the
service territory of a rural electric utility shall:
(a) Purchase its station power from the rural electric utility,
unless otherwise provided in a written agreement between the
wholesale generation facility and the rural electric utility.
(b) Adhere to all rules, rates and policies established by the
governing board of the rural electric utility relating to the delivery
of and payment for station power.
(c) Authorize the rural electric utility to install or certify the
proper operation of a meter that measures the use of station power
by a wholesale generation facility and provides the rural electric
utility with accurate monthly readings of that use.
2. A rural electric utility may charge to a wholesale
generation facility a retail rate for station power which is
commensurate with the rate the rural electric utility charges to
customers in its service territory with comparable load
magnitudes, load factors and other relevant characteristics.
3. If a wholesale generation facility receives station power
from a provider of electric service other than the rural electric
utility for the service territory in which the wholesale generation
facility is located, the provider of electric service shall remit to the
rural electric utility an amount equal to the payment which the
wholesale generation facility would have paid for such station
power if provided by the rural electric utility.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Municipal electric utility” includes, without limitation:
(1) An electric utility established pursuant to chapter 709 or
710 of NRS.
(2) Any other electric utility that is owned, operated or
controlled by a county, city or other local governmental entity.
(b) “Rural electric utility” means:
-
*AB529_R1*

– 3 –
(1) A cooperative association, nonprofit corporation,
nonprofit association or provider of electric service which is
declared to be a public utility pursuant to NRS 704.673 and which
provides service only to its members; or
(2) A municipal electric utility which provides electric
service to fewer than 100,000 retail electric meters.
(c) “Station power” means energy used on the site of a
wholesale generation facility for the operation, maintenance or
repair of the facility, including, without limitation, energy used for
lighting, thermal regulation, fuel processing and powering
equipment. The term:
(1) Includes any such load:
(I) That is served by a provider of electric service over a
distribution line that is connected to the system of the provider of
electric service at a point that is separate from the switchyard
where a generation or storage resource of the wholesale
generation facility is connected to the transmission system; or
(II) That is served by the system of a provider of electric
service that is connected to the transmission system at the same
point as a generation or storage resource of the wholesale
generation facility during any period when the generation or
storage resource is idle.
(2) With respect to a wholesale generation facility which
generates electricity from geothermal resources, does not include
energy used to operate fans or pumps or parasitic loads associated
with the production of electricity from a geothermal resource.
(d) “Wholesale generation facility” means a facility for the
generation of electricity that has a capacity in excess of 1
megawatt and:
(1) Is not affiliated through common ownership with an
end-use customer that purchases electricity; and
(2) Does not provide the electricity generated by the facility
directly and exclusively to the end-use customer described in
subparagraph (1).
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB529_R1*